Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-3807
Commission; executive board; purpose; members; powers.

(1) For purposes of administration of the commission during the interim between regular quarterly meetings, there is hereby established an executive board of the Commission on Asian American Affairs consisting of the chairperson of the commission and four members of the commission.

(2) The executive board may enter into contracts for consultation services, supplies, and equipment, if the amount contracted for does not exceed two thousand dollars in any one contract, and may supervise all programs relating to the affairs of Asian American people residing in Nebraska instituted and authorized by the commission.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 34.
July 19, 2024